Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.205

Release from physical custody, when—Authorized leaves—Leave plan and order—Notice.

(1) A juvenile sentenced to a term of confinement to be served under the supervision of the department shall not be released from the physical custody of the department prior to the release date established under RCW 13.40.210 except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) A juvenile serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the department may be released on authorized leave from the physical custody of the department only if consistent with public safety and if:

(a) Sixty percent of the minimum term of confinement has been served; and

(b) The purpose of the leave is to enable the juvenile:

(i) To visit the juvenile's family for the purpose of strengthening or preserving family relationships;

(ii) To make plans for parole or release which require the juvenile's personal appearance in the community and which will facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into the community; or

(iii) To make plans for a residential placement out of the juvenile's home which requires the juvenile's personal appearance in the community.

(3) No authorized leave may exceed seven consecutive days. The total of all preminimum term authorized leaves granted to a juvenile prior to final discharge from confinement shall not exceed thirty days.

(4) Prior to authorizing a leave, the secretary shall require a written leave plan, which shall detail the purpose of the leave and how it is to be achieved, the address at which the juvenile shall reside, the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave, and a statement by such person acknowledging familiarity with the leave plan and agreeing to supervise the juvenile and to notify the secretary immediately if the juvenile violates any terms or conditions of the leave. The leave plan shall include such terms and conditions as the secretary deems appropriate and shall be signed by the juvenile.

(5) Upon authorizing a leave, the secretary shall issue to the juvenile an authorized leave order which shall contain the name of the juvenile, the fact that the juvenile is on leave from a designated facility, the time period of the leave, and the identity of an appropriate official of the department to contact when necessary. The authorized leave order shall be carried by the juvenile at all times while on leave.

(6) Prior to the commencement of any authorized leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will reside during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave.

(7) The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the period of time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. In cases of emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portions of subsections (2)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section.

(8) If requested by the juvenile's victim or the victim's immediate family, the secretary shall give notice of any leave or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section to the victim or the victim's immediate family.

(9) A juvenile who violates any condition of an authorized leave plan or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section may be taken into custody and returned to the department in the same manner as an adult in identical circumstances.

(10) Community transition services is an electronic monitoring program as that term is used in RCW 9A.76.130.

(11) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a juvenile placed in minimum security status or in community transition services under subsection (13) of this section may participate in work, educational, community restitution, or treatment programs in the community up to twelve hours a day if approved by the secretary. Such a release shall not be deemed a leave of absence. This authorization may be increased to more than twelve hours a day up to sixteen hours a day if approved by the secretary and operated within the department's appropriations.

(12) Subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section do not apply to juveniles covered by RCW 13.40.215.

(13)(a) The department may require a person in its custody to serve the remainder of the person's sentence in community transition services if the department determines that such placement is in the best interest of the person and the community using the risk assessment tool and considering the availability of appropriate placements, treatment, and programming. The department's determination described under this subsection must include consideration of the person's behavior while in confinement and any disciplinary considerations. The department shall establish appropriate conditions the person must comply with to remain in community transition services. A person must have served 60 percent of their minimum term of confinement and no less than 15 weeks of total confinement including time spent in detention prior to sentencing or the entry of a dispositional order before becoming eligible for community transition services under the authority and supervision of the department.

(b) A person placed in community transition services under this section must have access to appropriate treatment and programming as determined by the department, including but not limited to:

(i) Behavioral health treatment;

(ii) Independent living;

(iii) Employment;

(iv) Education;

(v) Connections to family and natural supports; and

(vi) Community connections.

(c) Community transition services under this section is in lieu of confinement in an institution or community facility operated by the department, and will not fulfill any period of parole required under RCW 13.40.210.

(d) If a person placed in community transition services under this section violates a condition of participation in the community transition services program, or if the department determines that placement in the program is no longer in the best interests of the person or community, the person may be returned to an institution operated by the department at the department's discretion.

(e) The following persons are not eligible for community transition services under this section:

(i) Persons with pending charges or warrants;

(ii) Persons who will be transferred to the department of corrections, who are in the custody of the department of corrections, or who are under the supervision of the department of corrections;

(iii) Persons who were adjudicated or convicted of the crime of murder in the first or second degree;

(iv) Persons who meet the definition of a "persistent offender" as defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(v) Level III sex offenders; and

(vi) Persons requiring out-of-state placement.

(14) The department shall design, or contract for the design, and implement a risk assessment tool. The tool must be designed to limit bias related to race, ethnicity, gender, and age. The risk assessment tool must be certified at least every three years based on current academic standards for assessment validation, and can be certified by the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability or an outside researcher.

[ 2021 c 206 s 4; 2019 c 468 s 1; 2002 c 175 s 26; 1990 c 3 s 103; 1983 c 191 s 10.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—Findings—Appropriation—Rental vouchers—2021 c 206: See notes following RCW 72.01.412.

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.